District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.13

Application of District of Columbia and federal consumer protection laws.

This chapter shall not be construed to exempt natural gas suppliers from otherwise applicable District of Columbia or federal consumer protection laws.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 14, 51 DCR 10549